Idaho, session 2025, H0419.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Parks and Recreation the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. PARK OPERATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $485,500 $473,700 $959,200
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 319,700 197,200 516,900
Parks and Recreation
Fund 2,599,200 2,246,700 $997,500 $420,000 6,263,400
Recreational Fuels
Fund 418,100 558,900 1,278,000 2,971,800 5,226,800
Parks and Recreation Registration
Fund 307,300 245,100 9,650,000 10,202,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 15,600 15,600
Federal Grant
Fund 0 2,600 325,000 3,000,000 3,327,600
TOTAL $4,129,800 $3,739,800 $2,600,500 $16,041,800 $26,511,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
Recreational Fuels
Fund $2,000,000 $2,000,000
Federal Grant
Fund 2,400,000 2,400,000
TOTAL $4,400,000 $4,400,000
GRANDTOTAL $4,129,800 $3,739,800 $7,000,500 $16,041,800 $30,911,900
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Parks and Recreation is hereby
reduced by the following amounts for the Management Services Program from
the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $485,500 $473,700 $959,200
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 319,700 197,200 516,900
Parks and Recreation
Fund 1,759,000 2,051,700 $420,000 4,230,700
Recreational Fuels
Fund 418,100 558,900 2,971,800 3,948,800
Parks and Recreation Registration
Fund 307,300 145,100 9,650,000 10,102,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 15,600 15,600
Federal Grant
Fund 0 2,600 0 3,000,000 3,002,600
TOTAL $3,289,600 $3,444,800 $0 $16,041,800 $22,776,200


SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Parks and Recreation is hereby increased by five (5.00)
for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. EXEMPTIONS FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. Notwith-
standing the provisions of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, trustee and
benefit payments appropriated to the Department of Parks and Recreation for
grants in the Park Operations Program may be transferred to capital outlay in
the Capital Development Program for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026. Legislative appropriations shall not be transferred from one fund to
another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.